Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1619
Commissioner; certificate of accreditation; issuance; period valid; reaccreditation; application; list of schools.

The commissioner, upon determining that a private postsecondary career school has complied with all the requirements of the Private Postsecondary Career School Act and the rules and regulations of the department, shall issue a certificate of accreditation to the school. Unless disapproved for failure to meet the requirements for accreditation on a continuing basis as provided for in the act and as defined by the rules and regulations, accreditation shall be valid for a period of five years following the effective date appearing on the certificate. The application for reaccreditation shall be accompanied by the applicable fee. The department shall maintain a list of the schools accredited under this section and make such lists available to the public upon request.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 20;

Laws 1982, LB 370, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2820;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 19.